South Dakota, session 2026, HB1083.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 22-19A-1 be AMENDED:
22-19A-1. No person may:
(1) Willfully, maliciously, and repeatedly follow or harass another person;
(2) Make a credible threat to another person with the intent to place that person in
reasonable fear of death or great bodily injury; or
(3) Willfully, maliciously, and repeatedly harass another person by means of any
verbal, electronic, digital media, mechanical, telegraphic, or written
communication; or
(4) Knowingly disseminate, post, or publish, by electronic means, another person's
employment, home, or school address or location, or identifying information, as
defined by § 22-40-9, without the other person's consent, and with the intent to
intimidate, harass, or cause substantial emotional distress to the other person or
the other person's immediate family, as defined by § 22-1-2.
A violation of this section constitutes the crime of stalking. Stalking is a Class 1
misdemeanor. However, any Any second or subsequent conviction occurring within ten
years of a prior conviction under this section is a Class 6 felony. Any conviction for, or
plea of guilty to, an offense in another state which, if committed in this state, would be a
violation of this section and occurring within ten years prior to the date of the violation
being charged, shall must be used to determine if the violation being charged is a second
or subsequent offense.
Section 2. That § 22-19A-7 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.522.9 2 1083
22-19A-7. Any person who willfully, maliciously, and repeatedly follows or
harasses a child twelve years of age or younger, or who makes a credible threat to a child
twelve years of age or younger, with the intent to place that the child in reasonable fear
of death or great bodily injury, or with the intent to cause the child to reasonably fear for
the child's safety, is guilty of the crime of felony stalking. Felonious of a child. Felony
stalking of a child is a Class 6 felony.
Section 3. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 22-19A:
Any person who violates § 22-19A-1 against a public official, with the intent to
place the public official in reasonable fear of death or great bodily injury, or with the intent
to cause the public official to reasonably fear for the public official's safety, is guilty of the
crime of felony stalking of a public official. Felony stalking of a public official is a Class 6
felony.
For the purposes of this section, "public official" means:
(1) An elected official holding statewide office;
(2) A federal or state legislator;
(3) A federal or state judge or justice; or
(4) A law enforcement officer as defined in § 22-1-2.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.